Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1062.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Chapter 61 of Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER C.1STATE BLIGHT DATA COLLECTION SYSTEMSec.6135.1. Definitions.6135.2. Property Maintenance Code Serious Violations Registry. 6135.3. Property maintenance code serious violation reports. 6135.4. Dissemination of information by department.6135.5. Changing status of property on registry. 123456789101112131415161718 6135.6. Administrative requirements.6135.7. Audit.6135.8. Imposition of registry penalty . 6135.9. Property Maintenance Code Serious Violations Registry Account.6135.10 . Duty of Attorney General. § 6135.1. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Account." The Property Maintenance Code Serious Violations Registry Account established under this subchapter."Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Municipal claim." The term shall mean the same as defined in the act of May 16, 1923 (P.L.207, No.153), referred to as the Municipal Claim and Tax Lien Law."Registry." The Property Maintenance Code Serious Violations Registry established under section 6135.2 (relating to Property Maintenance Code Serious Violations Registry). § 6135.2. Property Maintenance Code Serious Violations Registry.(a) Establishment.--The Property Maintenance Code Serious Violations Registry is established. The department shall implement and administer the registry.(b) Purpose.--The registry shall contain property maintenance code serious violation reports filed by municipalities under section 6135.3 (relating to property maintenance code serious violation reports). § 6135.3. Property maintenance code serious violation reports. 20250HB1062PN1657 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Filing .--A municipality may file a property maintenance code serious violation report for a person who owns real property within the municipality with current serious property maintenance code violations that remain unabated for at least one year unless the municipality can demonstrate that it has, for at least one year, cited serious violations on a property prior to establishment of the registry.(b) Forms provided.--Property maintenance code serious violation reports shall be made on forms provided by the department and submitted electronically.(c) Information included.--Property maintenance code serious violation reports shall include the following information:(1) The name of the owner whose real property has been cited for a serious property maintenance code violation. If the property owner is a limited liability company or other business entity that does not list the principals of the limited liability company or other business entity, the department or the department's third-party entity shall attempt to find those principals or their agents and add their names to the registry, in addition to the name of the limited liability company or other business entity.(2) A copy of the citation issued to the real property owner.(3) The physical address , tax parcel number and county of the real property.(4) The number of municipal claims or liens attached to the real property by the filing municipality . (d) Access.--The department shall make the registry accessible electronically to all municipalities and the public.(e) Database.--The database shall be searchable by property 20250HB1062PN1657 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 owner and by property address.§ 6135.4. Dissemination of information by department.(a) Availability of information.--Information contained in a property maintenance code serious violation report shall be accessible for inspection and duplication in accordance with the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(b) Requests by municipalities.--(1) A municipality may request a copy of a property maintenance code serious violation report on a pending applicant for a municipal permit by submitting a property maintenance code serious violation report request form to the department or by requesting the form electronically. (2) The department shall disseminate a property maintenance code serious violation report relating to a municipal permit applicant to the requesting municipality within five business days of receipt of a property maintenance code serious violation report request from the municipality.(3) The municipality shall notify an applicant in writing of the reasons for a decision that denies the applicant a municipal permit if the decision is based in whole or in part on information contained in the registry.(c) Requests by Commonwealth and Attorney General .-- (1) A Commonwealth agency or the Attorney General may request a copy of a property maintenance code serious violation report on a pending applicant for a permit, licensing or certification by submitting a property maintenance code serious violation report request form to the department or by requesting the form electronically. 20250HB1062PN1657 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The department shall disseminate a property maintenance code serious violation report relating to a State license or certification applicant to a requesting Commonwealth agency within 30 days of receipt of a property maintenance code serious violation report request from the agency.(3) The Commonwealth agency shall notify the applicant in writing of the reasons for a decision that denies the permit, licensing or certification requested by the applicant if the decision is based in whole or in part on information contained in the registry.(d) Hearing requested by applicant.--(1) The department shall hold a hearing regarding why the property owner is listed on the registry, as applicable. If the applicant can produce a certificate or letter of code compliance from the municipality, the department shall update the official record within 48 hours to reflect the new information.(2) The municipality or Commonwealth agency shall hold a hearing regarding administrative appeals related to permit denials.(e) Record of dissemination.--The department shall maintain a listing of Commonwealth agencies, municipalities and other entities that have requested information on a particular real property owner and the date on which the information was disseminated. The Attorney General shall be exempt from this listing in order to protect the confidentiality of investigations. This listing shall be maintained separate from the registry.(f) Fee.--The department may not assess a fee for the 20250HB1062PN1657 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 dissemination of property maintenance code serious violation information.§ 6135.5. Changing status of property on registry.A municipality that files a report with the department shall subsequently supply the property owner with a certificate of compliance once the real property is declared to be brought back into code compliance. The property owner shall forward a copy of the certificate of compliance to the department if the property owner wishes to have the property's status changed to "cured" on the registry. The department shall include the information as part of the official record for the specific property and owner of the real property.(A) CERTIFICATE OF COMPLIANCE.--(1) A MUNICIPALITY THAT FILES A REPORT WITH THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SUBSEQUENTLY SUPPLY THE PROPERTY OWNER WITH A CERTIFICATE OF COMPLIANCE ONCE THE REAL PROPERTY IS DECLARED TO BE BROUGHT BACK INTO CODE COMPLIANCE.(2) THE PROPERTY OWNER MUST FORWARD A COPY OF THE CERTIFICATE OF COMPLIANCE TO THE DEPARTMENT IF THE PROPERTY OWNER WISHES TO HAVE THE PROPERTY'S STATUS CHANGED TO "CURED" ON THE REGISTRY.(3) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL INCLUDE THE INFORMATION AS PART OF THE OFFICIAL RECORD FOR THE SPECIFIC PROPERTY AND OWNER OF THE REAL PROPERTY.(B) REMOVAL OF INFORMATION FROM OFFICIAL RECORD.--THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REMOVE FROM THE OFFICIAL RECORD ALL INFORMATION PERTAINING TO A REAL PROPERTY OR ITS OWNER WHEN THE REAL PROPERTY HAS REMAINED UNDER A "CURED" DESIGNATION FOR A PERIOD OF TWO YEARS.§ 6135.6. Administrative requirements.20250HB1062PN1657 - 6 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Procedures.--The department shall issue guidelines to effectuate the purposes of this subchapter, which shall include procedures to ensure the completeness and accuracy of information in the registry. The department may contract with a third-party entity to assist in carrying out the department's duties under this subchapter.(b) Forms.--The department shall develop property maintenance code serious violation report forms and property maintenance code serious violation report request forms, as well as procedures to obtain the information electronically.(c) Security requirements.--The department shall maintain the confidentiality and security of the information contained in the registry by providing that:(1) Procedures have been instituted to reasonably protect the registry from theft, fire, sabotage, flood, wind or other natural or manmade disasters.(2) All personnel authorized to access registry information are selected, supervised and trained accordingly.§ 6135.7. Audit.(a) Duty of Auditor General.--The Auditor General may conduct annual performance audits of registry operations for the first three years of the registry's existence and then every five years thereafter.(b) Access to records.--The department shall provide auditors with access to all records, reports and listings required to conduct an audit of property maintenance code serious violations record information. Persons that have supervision of or are authorized to receive registry information shall cooperate with auditors and provide requested information.(c) Contents of audit.--The audit shall report in writing 20250HB1062PN1657 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 deficiencies and recommendations for correcting the deficiencies. The department shall respond to the audit recommendations within a reasonable period of time . § 6135.8. Imposition of registry penalty . A property owner that is in serious violation of a municipal property maintenance code for more than one year that has been placed on the property registry by a municipality may be subject to a registry penalty in the amount of $1,000 for each serious violation. The following apply to the penalty:(1) The penalty shall be in addition to any other applicable fees or charges lawfully collected by the municipality and court.(2) The municipality shall collect the penalty, deduct administrative costs and transmit the remaining money to the department on a quarterly basis.(3) The penalty may take the form of a lien on the real property, and the municipality may file the lien with the county prothonotary or equivalent office.(4) Money transmitted to the department under paragraph (2) shall be deposited into the account.§ 6135.9. Property Maintenance Code Serious Violations Registry Account . (a) Establishment.--The Property Maintenance Code Serious Violations Registry Account is established within the State Treasury. The money in the account is appropriated on a continuing basis to the department for the purposes provided in this subchapter. The account shall consist of money transmitted under section 6135.8(2) (relating to imposition of registry penalty), transferred or appropriated from the General Fund to the account or otherwise made available to the account.20250HB1062PN1657 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Distribution.--The department may distribute money in excess of the money transferred or appropriated from the General Fund to municipalities participating in the registry.(c) Purposes.--In addition to the purpose under subsection (b), money in the account may be used for the following purposes:(1) By the department to reimburse the department for its administrative costs in carrying out its responsibilities under this subchapter.(2) By the unified judicial system to conduct training of the judiciary in accordance with 42 Pa.C.S. § 1907 (relating to deteriorated real property education and training programs for judges).(3) By the Department of the Auditor General to reimburse that department for the costs of conducting the audits authorized by section 6135.7 (relating to audit).§ 6135.10 . Duty of Attorney General. (a) Out-of-State property owners.--For a person who lives or has a principal place of residence outside this Commonwealth and owns real estate property in this Commonwealth, upon written request by a municipality, the Attorney General may assist the municipality in pursuing compliance of the property owner in order to bring the property up to municipal code if:(1) A serious code violation has been cited.(2) The property owner is charged under 53 Pa.C.S. § 6115 (relating to failure to comply with a code requirement).(3) The property owner was properly notified of the violations.(b) Remedies.--For a violation under subsection (a), the Attorney General may send a warning letter to the property owner 20250HB1062PN1657 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or file a court proceeding on behalf of the municipality.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 120 days.20250HB1062PN1657 - 10 - 12